uz.aff
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganingizdadir . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganingizdada . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganingizdadirda . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganingizdamikan . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganingizdaku . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlarimni . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlarimnimi . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlarimnidir . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlarimnida . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlarimnidirda . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlarimnimikan . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlarimniku . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlarimning . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlarimningmi . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlarimningdir . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlarimningda . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlarimningdirda . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlarimningmikan . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlarimningku . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlarimga . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlarimgami . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlarimgadir . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlarimgada . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlarimgadirda . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlarimgamikan . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlarimgaku . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlarimdan . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlarimdanmi . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlarimdandir . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlarimdanda . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlarimdandirda . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlarimdanmikan . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlarimdanku . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlarimda . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlarimdami . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlarimdadir . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlarimdada . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlarimdadirda . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlarimdamikan . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlarimdaku . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlarini . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlarinimi . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlarinidir . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlarinida . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlarinidirda . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlarinimikan . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlariniku . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlarining . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlariningmi . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlariningdir . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlariningda . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlariningdirda . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlariningmikan . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlariningku . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlariga . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlarigami . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlarigadir . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlarigada . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlarigadirda . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlarigamikan . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlarigaku . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlaridan . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlaridanmi . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlaridandir . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlaridanda . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlaridandirda . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlaridanmikan . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlaridanku . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlarida . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlaridami . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlaridadir . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlaridada . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlaridadirda . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlaridamikan . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlaridaku . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlarimizni . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlarimiznimi . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlarimiznidir . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlarimiznida . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlarimiznidirda . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlarimiznimikan . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlarimizniku . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlarimizning . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlarimizningmi . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlarimizningdir . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlarimizningda . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlarimizningdirda . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlarimizningmikan . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlarimizningku . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlarimizga . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlarimizgami . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlarimizgadir . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlarimizgada . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlarimizgadirda . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlarimizgamikan . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlarimizgaku . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlarimizdan . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlarimizdanmi . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlarimizdandir . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlarimizdanda . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlarimizdandirda . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlarimizdanmikan . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlarimizdanku . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlarimizda . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlarimizdami . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlarimizdadir . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlarimizdada . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlarimizdadirda . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlarimizdamikan . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlarimizdaku . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlaringizni . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlaringiznimi . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlaringiznidir . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlaringiznida . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlaringiznidirda . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlaringiznimikan . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlaringizniku . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlaringizning . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlaringizningmi . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlaringizningdir . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlaringizningda . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlaringizningdirda . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlaringizningmikan . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlaringizningku . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlaringizga . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlaringizgami . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlaringizgadir . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlaringizgada . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlaringizgadirda . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlaringizgamikan . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlaringizgaku . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlaringizdan . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlaringizdanmi . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlaringizdandir . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlaringizdanda . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlaringizdandirda . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlaringizdanmikan . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlaringizdanku . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlaringizda . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlaringizdami . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlaringizdadir . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlaringizdada . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlaringizdadirda . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlaringizdamikan . 
SFX Y 0 ishmayotganlaringizdaku . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganimni . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganimnimi . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganimnidir . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganimnida . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganimnidirda . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganimnimikan . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganimniku . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganimning . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganimningmi . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganimningdir . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganimningda . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganimningdirda . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganimningmikan . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganimningku . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganimga . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganimgami . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganimgadir . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganimgada . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganimgadirda . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganimgamikan . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganimgaku . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganimdan . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganimdanmi . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganimdandir . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganimdanda . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganimdandirda . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganimdanmikan . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganimdanku . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganimda . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganimdami . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganimdadir . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganimdada . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganimdadirda . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganimdamikan . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganimdaku . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganini . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganinimi . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganinidir . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganinida . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganinidirda . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganinimikan . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganiniku . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganining . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganiningmi . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganiningdir . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganiningda . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganiningdirda . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganiningmikan . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganiningku . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganiga . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganigami . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganigadir . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganigada . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganigadirda . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganigamikan . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganigaku . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganidan . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganidanmi . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganidandir . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganidanda . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganidandirda . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganidanmikan . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganidanku . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganida . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganidami . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganidadir . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganidada . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganidadirda . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganidamikan . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganidaku . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganimizni . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganimiznimi . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganimiznidir . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganimiznida . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganimiznidirda . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganimiznimikan . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganimizniku . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganimizning . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganimizningmi . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganimizningdir . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganimizningda . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganimizningdirda . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganimizningmikan . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganimizningku . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganimizga . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganimizgami . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganimizgadir . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganimizgada . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganimizgadirda . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganimizgamikan . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganimizgaku . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganimizdan . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganimizdanmi . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganimizdandir . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganimizdanda . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganimizdandirda . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganimizdanmikan . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganimizdanku . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganimizda . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganimizdami . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganimizdadir . 
SFX Y 0 dirayotganimizdada . 
