uz.dic
avjlantir/Y
adashtiril/Y
ajrattir/Y
ayir/Y
ayrimlan/Y
alangalat/Y
alishin/Y
angillat/Y
aniqlat/Y
arahlan/Y
arralash/Y
asabiylan/Y
asfaltlan/Y
axtartir/Y
ayash/Y
badfe’llash/Y
bayryalash/Y
baravarlash/Y
basma-baslash/Y
bachkanalashtir/Y
bezanglat/Y
bezdirtir/Y
bekittiril/Y
bemorlan/Y
ber/Y
betashvishlan/Y
behollan/Y
biqin/Y
bildir/Y
biltirat/Y
bitir/Y
bichtir/Y
boqqizil/Y
boplan/Y
bostiril/Y
boshqalat/Y
bo’g’dir/Y
bo’g’/Y
bo’zdiril/Y
bo’ylash/Y
buk/Y
bulat/Y
bo’lishtir/Y
burattir/Y
burqirat/Y
bo’rttir/Y
but/Y
bo’shat/Y
buyal/Y
vadirlash/Y
valdirat/Y
vahimalan/Y
vovillash/Y
gazlan/Y
gapirgiz/Y
gezart/Y
gipnozlan/Y
go’g’ral/Y
gumur/Y
go’sxo’rlan/Y
dazmollat/Y
damlan/Y
darmonsizlantir/Y
deyol/Y
deyaver/Y
dilozorlash/Y
differensiyalash/Y
dorilat/Y
dukurlash/Y
do’ndirtir/Y
durustlash/Y
yovuqlash/Y
yog’/Y
yozaver/Y
yeyil/Y
yoqlattir/Y
yeliktir/Y
yelpn/Y
yengillat/Y
yopin/Y
yoril/Y
yetaklat/Y
yetkizil/Y
yechinish/Y
yoedir/Y
jazillat/Y
jafolan/Y
jiyir/Y
jilovlan/Y
jihozlan/Y
judolash/Y
jo’rnllash/Y
zamazqalat/Y
zarhallan/Y
ziyodalash/Y
zichlashtiril/Y
zuvillat/Y
ig’diril/Y
izolyatsiyalan/Y
yig’lash/Y
yiltillat/Y
yirt/Y
ilash/Y
iljay/Y
ilhaqlan/Y
individuallashtiril/Y
inonish/Y
ioshodlan/Y
yrillat/Y
isqirtlan/Y
istytil/Y
yo’qlan/Y
yo’nal/Y
ifloslantir/Y
ichirgiz/Y
ishar/Y
ishonaver/Y
kavsharlash/Y
kaltaklat/Y
karashlan/Y
kattalashtiril/Y
kekirtir/Y
keltir/Y
kerysh/Y
kestirtir/Y
kechir/Y
kiygiz/Y
kirgiz/Y
kir/Y
klassifikatsiyalan/Y
konveyerlashtir/Y
kraxmallan/Y
kuyman/Y
kulchalan/Y
ko’niktir/Y
ko’plash/Y
ko’ril/Y
ko’rsat/Y
kuttiril/Y
kuyuk/Y
qabullan/Y
qadal/Y
qayg’urish/Y
qayral/Y
qaychilan/Y
qalash/Y
qaltirash/Y
qanqay/Y
qaratil/Y
qartaytir/Y
qatlat/Y
qashin/Y
qizarish/Y
qizit/Y
qiyqir/Y
qiyshayish/Y
qil/Y
qimmatlash/Y
qirqil/Y
qisin/Y
qitiqlash/Y
qiyalash/Y
qovushtiril/Y
qo’ydirtir/Y
qo’ndirish/Y
qo’port/Y
qo’rish/Y
qurchlan/Y
quch/Y
quyultir/Y
lallay/Y
lipillat/Y
loklat/Y
magnitlan/Y
mazmunsizlantiril/Y
makkorlash/Y
mahalliylashtiril/Y
ma’rat/Y
meshchanlan/Y
minalat/Y
miriqtir/Y
moylash/Y
muammolash/Y
mujish/Y
muqal/Y
munkaytir/Y
mo’hmallashtir/Y
nayzalash/Y
nafislan/Y
nikellat/Y
novdalan/Y
normalashtir/Y
nhrash/Y
ovqatlantir/Y
og’irsin/Y
oddiylash/Y
ozdirtir/Y
oqizdir/Y
olg’irlash/Y
ol/Y
olchoqlan/Y
oralat/Y
ortish/Y
otamlash/Y
ochil/Y
oshib-kamay/Y
palidlan/Y
parchalan/Y
peshlatil/Y
pichoqlan/Y
pishqirtir/Y
popillat/Y
po’ng’illash/Y
ravshanlan/Y
rayonlashtir/Y
ratsionallash/Y
rostlan/Y
savdolash/Y
sakrat/Y
sanoatlashtiril/Y
sarg’aytir/Y
sevil/Y
sekinlashtir/Y
sergaklan/Y
sig’/Y
siypalan/Y
silliqlat/Y
sintezlashtir/Y
sirlan/Y
snrgan/Y
sog’ish/Y
solin/Y
soflan/Y
suvlan/Y
sudrat/Y
so’ydirtir/Y
so’qqay/Y
so’lqillat/Y
so’rash/Y
surin/Y
so’r/Y
so’cho’ktomoq/Y
suyat/Y
tayoqlattir/Y
takillat/Y
taqalish/Y
taqsimlash/Y
tamg’alan/Y
tanish/Y
taraddudlan/Y
tarattir/Y
tatbiqlan/Y
tashvishlanish/Y
ta’kidlan/Y
tebratil/Y
tezaklat/Y
tekkiz/Y
tentirash/Y
terdir/Y
tesh/Y
tizish/Y
tiklash/Y
tiqllishtir/Y
tillash/Y
tindirtiril/Y
tinchlat/Y
tirgiz/Y
tirmalat/Y
tislantir/Y
tishat/Y
tozalanil/Y
toy/Y
tomizdir/Y
topish/Y
toray/Y
totin/Y
tugallash/Y
to’dalattir/Y
to’zdirtir/Y
to’yg’az/Y
to’kish/Y
to’qlan/Y
to’lg’azil/Y
to’lishtir/Y
tunat/Y
to’ntar/Y
to’ralash/Y
turtin/Y
tutamlat/Y
tutqiz/Y
tushiril/Y
tuyat/Y
o’gaylan/Y
uzaytir/Y
uzgart/Y
uz/Y
uyg’unlashtir/Y
o’ylantir/Y
o’ynoqlat/Y
uqalash/Y
uqtiril/Y
o’ldirtir/Y
o’lchat/Y
o’ng’aril/Y
o’pir/Y
o’ran/Y
urdir/Y
o’rish/Y
o’rnashtiril/Y
o’sallash/Y
o’tiril/Y
o’tkirlash/Y
o’tmaslash/Y
o’xshatil/Y
uchish/Y
uchrashtir/Y
o’edirtir/Y
faranglash/Y
xarakterlan/Y
xaxalash/Y
xipchinlat/Y
xoinlash/Y
xotirjamlash/Y
xo’raklantir/Y
xushbo’ylan/Y
chagalatil/Y
chayqat/Y
chaqin/Y
chaqchayish/Y
chalkash/Y
changallash/Y
chaplashtir/Y
chatishtir/Y
chekinish/Y
chig’illash/Y
chiqar/Y
chimir/Y
chirillash/Y
choklattir/Y
chuvurlat/Y
cho’k/Y
cho’m/Y
shablonlash/Y
shanqilchat/Y
shildirash/Y
shiravaqay/Y
shopillat/Y
sho’mshayish/Y
egarlat/Y
eziltir/Y
eko’nlashtnr/Y
elektrlan/Y
elt/Y
em/Y
erkalat/Y
e’tiborsizlantir/Y
yutqiz/Y
yarashtir/Y
yashart/Y
